California, session 20252026, SB761.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 69408.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:69408.5. (a) Upon entering into a data-sharing agreement pursuant to Section 18901.13 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the commission shall, in compliance with state and federal laws, amend the commission’s Grant Delivery System to ensure both of the following:(1) Students that might be eligible for the CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are identified.(2) Students identified pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be able to provide their separate and distinct consent to the commission for their contact information to be shared with the State Department of Social Services, and for the State Department of Social Services to further share their contact information with the appropriate county human services agency and the public postsecondary education institution in which the student is enrolled, for the sole purpose of identifying, supporting, and linking students to on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources pursuant to Sections 66023.4 and 66023.5, including conducting direct outreach about the CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) Upon completion of subdivision (a), the commission shall provide the State Department of Social Services with information for students who have granted their separate and distinct consent to have their contact information shared, pursuant to a data-sharing agreement, as described in Section 18901.13 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(c) For purposes of this section, “contact information” shall be limited to the legal name, email address, ZIP Code or county of residence, and telephone number of the student.SEC. 2. Section 69432.93 is added to the Education Code, to read:69432.93. (a) Upon entering into a data-sharing agreement pursuant to Section 18901.13 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the commission shall, in compliance with state and federal laws, amend the commission’s Grant Delivery System to ensure both of the following:(1) Students that might be eligible for the CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are identified.(2) Students identified pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be able to provide their separate and distinct consent to the commission for their contact information to be shared with the State Department of Social Services, and for the State Department of Social Services to further share their contact information with the appropriate county human services agency and the public postsecondary education institution in which the student is enrolled, for the sole purpose of identifying, supporting, and linking students to on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources pursuant to Sections 66023.4 and 66023.5, including conducting direct outreach about the CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) Upon completion of subdivision (a), the commission shall provide the State Department of Social Services with information for students who have granted their separate and distinct consent to have their contact information shared, pursuant to a data-sharing agreement, as described in Section 18901.13 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(c) For purposes of this section, “contact information” shall be limited to the legal name, email address, ZIP Code or county of residence, and telephone number of the student.SEC. 3. Section 18901.12 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 18901.12 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18901.12. (a) Commencing on or before July 1, 2026, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, any campus-based program of study at a public institution of higher education shall be considered as a state-approved local educational program that increases employability that has a component that is equivalent to a component specified in Section 273.7(e)(2) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and that qualifies for the student exemption for CalFresh eligibility, as described in Section 273.5(b)(11)(iv) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(b) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, submit to the department a list of their offered campus-based programs of study. The department shall approve those programs that meet the requirements specified in subdivision (a).(c) A campus-based program at a campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California that is not included in the list described in subdivision (b), or that is rejected by the department pursuant to subdivision (b), may submit a certification application to the department. The department shall approve the certification applications for campus-based programs that meet the requirement specified in subdivision (a).(d) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the President of the University of California shall not be required to resubmit to the department a list of their offered campus-based programs of study if those programs have been approved as a local educational program that increases employability. (e) (1) On or before September 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, until 2030, the department shall report to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Assembly Committee on Human Services, the Senate Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Human Services all of the following information:(A) The number of state-approved campus-based local educational programs that increase employability that are approved pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), disaggregated by name and campus.(B) The number of pending applications, disaggregated by name and campus.(C) The number of applications denied, disaggregated by name and campus, and the reason for the denials.(2) The department shall also post the report described in paragraph (1) on its internet website.(f) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions that shall have the same force and effect as regulations.(2) On or before May 31, 2026, the department shall issue a guidance letter to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the President of the University of California that notifies them of the changes made to this section by the act that added this section.SEC. 5. Section 18901.13 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately following Section 18901.12, to read:18901.13. (a) The department and the Student Aid Commission shall develop a data-sharing agreement meeting the requirements of applicable state and federal law and regulations, under which the commission shall share the student information described in Section 69408.5 or 69432.93 of the Education Code with the department for the purpose described in subdivision (b).(b) Pursuant to the data agreement established in subdivision (a), the department may share the student information with the appropriate county human services agency and the appropriate public postsecondary education systemwide office of the campus in which the student is enrolled for the sole purpose of identifying, supporting, and linking students to on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources pursuant to Sections 66023.4 and 66023.5 of the Education Code, including conducting direct outreach to students about the CalFresh program. (c) Commencing with the 2027–28 academic year, and only if data has been shared by the department pursuant to subdivision (b), each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, contact all students who, pursuant to Section 69408.5 or 69432.93 of the Education Code, as applicable, opted in to have their contact information shared with the department for purposes of informing students about on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources pursuant to Sections 66023.4 and 66023.5 of the Education Code, including the CalFresh program.(d) (1) Data shared pursuant to this section shall be done in compliance with applicable federal and state laws to protect individual privacy, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code.(2) Data shared pursuant to this section, with the separate and distinct consent of the student, shall not be shared with any other entity or used for any purpose other than for identifying, supporting, and linking students to on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources pursuant to Sections 66023.4 and 66023.5 of the Education Code, including conducting direct outreach to students about the CalFresh program.(e) For purposes of this section, “public postsecondary education systemwide office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, or the office of the President of the University of California.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.